Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5231.01
Bona fide association, defined.

Bona fide association
means, with respect to health insurance coverage offered in this state, an
association that meets the following conditions:

(1) Has been actively
in existence for at least five years;

(2) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for
purposes other than obtaining insurance;

(3) Does not condition membership in the association
on a health-status-related factor of an individual, including an employee
or a dependent of any employee;

(4) Makes health insurance coverage offered through
the association available to any member regardless of a health-status-related
factor of the member or individual eligible for coverage through a member;
and

(5)
Does not make available health insurance coverage offered through the association
other than in connection with a member of the association.

Laws 2009, LB192, § 7.